Tennessee statutes. Title 35 Fiduciaries And Trust Estates
Chapter 50

Miscellaneous Provisions

35-50-101. Joint control of deposits by principal and surety is lawful.

It is lawful for any party of whom a bond, undertaking or other obligation is required to agree with the party's surety or sureties for the deposit of any or all moneys and assets for which the party and surety or sureties are or may be held responsible, with a bank, savings bank, safe deposit or trust company, authorized by law to do business as such, or with another depository; provided, that the other depository is approved by the court or a judge of the court, if the deposit is otherwise proper, for the safekeeping of the money or assets and in such manner as to prevent the withdrawal of the money or assets or any part of the money or assets, without the written consent of the surety or sureties, or an order of the court, or a judge of the court, made on such notice to the surety or sureties as the court or judge may direct; and provided further, that the agreement shall not in any manner release from or change the liability of the principal or sureties as established by the terms of the bond.

Acts 1941, ch. 10, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 7806.1 (Williams, § 7810.1); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-601.

Cross-References. Taxation of gifts, title 67, ch. 8, part 1.

35-50-102. Insurance trusts — Creation — Validity.

Any trust previously or subsequently established by the depositing with or transferring to a trustee of any life, accident or health insurance policies with proceeds assigned or otherwise made payable to the trustee, irrespective of whether the designation of policy beneficiary is revocable or irrevocable, or whether the insured reserves loan privileges, the right to receive the cash surrender values under any of the policies, the right to receive dividends, or any other or all benefits under any of the policies and/or avails the insured thereof, and irrespective also of whether or not the creator of the trust reserves to the creator the right to modify the trust or withdraw part or all of the property from the trust, shall be valid and legally effective as to all the property and the disposition of the property, except any that may have been affected by the exercise of any of the reserved rights, and it shall not be necessary to the validity of the trust that the instrument creating the trust be executed according to the formalities prescribed for the execution of wills.

Code 1932, § 9596; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-602.

Law Reviews.

Chancery Procedure — Hearing on Bill and Answer, 17 Tenn. L. Rev. 399 (1943).

35-50-103. Life insurance proceeds payable to trustee.

Life insurance may be made payable to a trustee to be named as beneficiary in the policy, and the proceeds of that insurance shall be paid to the trustee and shall be held and disposed of by the trustee as provided in a trust agreement made by the insured during the insured's lifetime. It shall not be necessary to the validity of any such trust agreement or declaration of trust that it have a trust corpus other than the right of the trustee to receive the insurance proceeds as beneficiary.

A policy of life insurance may designate as beneficiary a trustee or trustees named by will, if the designation is made in accordance with the policy and the requirements of the insurance company. Upon probate of the will, the proceeds of such insurance shall be payable to the trustee or trustees to be held and disposed of under the terms of the will as they exist as of the date of the death of the testator and in the same manner as other testamentary trusts are administered; but if no qualified trustee makes claim to the proceeds from the insurance company within eighteen (18) months after the death of the insured, or if satisfactory evidence is furnished to the insurance company within the eighteen-month period showing that there is or will be no trustee to receive the proceeds, payment shall be made by the insurance company to the executors, administrators or assigns of the insured, unless otherwise provided by agreement with the insurance company during the lifetime of the insured.

The proceeds of the insurance as received by the trustee or trustees shall not be subject to debts of the insured.

Insurance proceeds so held in trust shall not be considered part of the insured's estate for administration purposes.

Insurance proceeds so held in trust may be commingled with any other assets that may properly come into the trust.

Nothing in this section shall affect the validity of any life insurance policy beneficiary designation previously made naming trustees of trusts established by living trust or by will.

Acts 1969, ch. 262, § 1; T.C.A., § 35-620.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence. 15 Tenn. Juris., Insurance, § 73.

Law Reviews.

Non-Tax Aspects of Estate Planning (Ronald Lee Gilman), 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 41 (1972).

35-50-104. Purchase of annuity contract.

In order to relieve estates and trusts of the burden of an annuity, the chancery court, on petition of one (1) or more of the beneficiaries in remainder in the estate or trust, or any portion of the estate or trust, is empowered, when not in terms prohibited by the will or trust instrument, to decree the purchase, in behalf of the annuitant, of an annuity contract of some insurance company, or insurer, that will afford the accordant definite income, for the stated term of life, stipulated for the annuitant by the law, or provision of the will or trust.

The cost of the annuity contract shall be paid out of the funds of the estate or trust; provided, that the contract shall be purchased only from a company or insurer admitted to do business in the state; and provided further, that all persons in interest, including the trustee or other fiduciary, complainant or defendant, shall be parties to the petition, and that the annuitant shall consent to the purchase and to the release of the annuitant's claim upon the estate or trust; or the court in the annuitant's behalf, if the annuitant is a minor or incompetent.

The annuity contract shall be one issued by a company or insurer, selected by, or for as aforementioned, the annuitant and approved by the court.

Should any beneficiary of a remainder interest not concur, that person's interest in the estate or trust shall not be distributed until the death of the annuitant or expiration of the term stipulated, nor charged with any part of the cost of the contract. In that event, however, the beneficiary or beneficiaries of the remainder interest concurring shall be entitled to distribution of their respective interests, upon paying the cost of an annuity contract as will be productive of an income to the annuitant proportionate to their interest in the entire remainder estate, and paying all costs of the application.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the acceleration of distribution except where it appears to the court that the payment of an annuity, or its equivalent, is the sole remaining purpose of the trust's continuance.

Acts 1929, ch. 23, §§ 1, 2; mod. Code 1932, §§ 8135-8138; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 35-603 — 35-606.

Collateral References.

Merger of legal and equitable estates where sole trustees are sole beneficiaries. 7 A.L.R.4th 621.

Relinquishment of interest by life beneficiary in possession as accelerating remainder of which there is substitutional gift in case primary remainderman does not survive life beneficiary. 7 A.L.R.4th 1084.

35-50-105. Fiduciaries may effect liability and accident insurance on property.

All guardians, executors, administrators and trustees are authorized to effect liability and accident insurance, in such amount as may be reasonable and proper, on any or all real or personal property under their management and control.

Premiums paid on insurance effected according to subsection (a) shall be a proper charge against the estate under management or control, and shall be allowed as a credit on settlements made.

Acts 1925, ch. 24, §§ 1, 2; Shan. Supp., §§ 3349a3, 3349a4; Code 1932, §§ 6215, 6216; T.C.A. (orig. ed.) §§ 35-607, 35-608.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (5th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 738.

35-50-106. Trusts for employees' benefit — Rule against perpetuities.

No trust previously or subsequently created by an employer as a part of a pension, stock bonus, disability, death benefit, profit sharing or similar plan for the exclusive benefit of some or all of the employer's employees or their beneficiaries to which contributions are made by the employer or employees, or both employer and employees, for the purpose of distributing to the employees or their beneficiaries, the earnings or principal or both earnings and principal, of the trust, shall be deemed to be invalid by reason of any existing law or rule against perpetuities or suspension of the power of alienation; but the trust may continue for such time as may be necessary to accomplish the purposes for which it may be created. The income arising from any property held in trust may be permitted to accumulate for the length permitted by the instrument creating the trust, or, if no time is so specified, for the time the trustee or trustees deem necessary to accomplish the purposes of the trust.

Acts 1955, ch. 293, § 1; T.C.A., § 35-609.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (5th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 177.

35-50-107. Limitations on appointment of nonresident fiduciary.

Any person who is not a resident of this state or any corporation that is authorized to exercise fiduciary powers, but is not authorized to do business in this state and does not actually maintain an office in this state, shall not be appointed or allowed to serve as trustee of a corporate or personal trust, personal representative of an estate, guardian, conservator for an incompetent person, guardian for a minor or in any other fiduciary capacity, unless there is also appointed as a fiduciary to serve with such nonresident fiduciary, a person resident in this state or corporation authorized to do business in this state and that maintains an office in this state, except as provided in subdivision (a)(2). In the event the resident cofiduciary ceases for any reason to act, then a new resident cofiduciary shall be appointed.

The following nonresident persons or corporations may serve as fiduciaries, whether the appointment is by will, deed, trust agreement, court order or decree or otherwise:

Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2)(C), a bank or trust company organized and doing business under the laws of any state or territory of the United States, including the District of Columbia, other than this state, or a national bank or trust company, duly authorized so to act, may be appointed and may serve in this state as a fiduciary, when and to the extent that the state, territory or District of Columbia in which the bank or trust company is organized or has its principal place of business grants authority to serve in like fiduciary capacities to a bank or trust company organized and doing business under the laws of this state or a national bank or trust company having its principal office in this state;

Any resident or nonresident person may serve as a personal representative of the estate of a decedent;

Any corporation that is authorized to exercise fiduciary powers may serve as trustee of an inter vivos personal or corporate trust, regardless of the residence of the trustee;

Any person may serve as trustee of a trust, regardless of the residence of the trustee;

Any person may serve as the guardian of the person of a minor, regardless of the residence of the guardian;

Any person may serve as the conservator of the person of an incompetent person, regardless of the residence of the conservator;

Any person or corporation authorized to exercise fiduciary powers may serve as agent or attorney-in-fact under a power of attorney, regardless of the residence of the agent or attorney-in-fact; and

A trust company that is organized under the laws of another state as a bank, trust company or savings bank that:

Has an office in this state that is not its principal office, meets the definition of a trust institution under 12 U.S.C. § 1841(c)(2)(D), and is a direct or indirect subsidiary of a bank holding company that has a direct or indirect bank, trust company or savings bank subsidiary that has an office in this state in which deposits are accepted; or

Has an office in this state that is not its principal office and accepts deposits at its office in this state.

All fiduciaries appointed and serving under this section who are not residents of this state shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state as to any action or claim for relief arising from any estate or trust within this state for which such nonresident person is acting as fiduciary in the manner described in §§ 20-2-214 — 20-2-219 or in any other manner or matter involving an estate or trust being administered in this state.

Any nonresident person, bank or trust company shall not act in any such capacities, until it has appointed in writing the secretary of state as its agent for service of process, upon whom all process in any suit or proceeding against it may be served in any action or proceeding relating to any trust, estate or matter within this state in respect of which such person, bank or trust company is acting in any such fiduciary capacity, and in the writing shall agree that any process against it, which shall be served upon the secretary of state, shall be of the same legal force and validity as if served on the person, bank or trust company. The appointment must identify the specific trust, estate, or person for which the fiduciary has been appointed, state the name and street address, including zip code, of the fiduciary and be accompanied by a ten dollar ($10.00) filing fee. This appointment shall continue so long as any liability remains outstanding against the person, bank or trust company pertaining to any such matters. Upon receipt of any such process, it is the duty of the secretary of state forthwith to forward the process by registered or certified mail to the person, bank or trust company at the address furnished in the writing. It shall be the responsibility of the nonresident personal representative to secure appointment of the secretary of state as agent for service of process and to provide the court with a copy of the receipt from the secretary of state.

Unless otherwise provided in the trust agreement or will or by § 30-1-201, the court having jurisdiction shall require the person, bank or trust company to give bond for the performance of the fiduciary relationship, in which case the statute in such cases shall apply. Even if bond is otherwise waived, the court may, in its discretion, require a nonresident person qualifying as personal representative according to subdivision (a)(2)(B) to furnish bond in an amount equal to the value of assets of the personal estate being removed from this state during the period of estate administration. In the case of intestate succession, no nonresident person qualifying as a personal representative according to subdivision (a)(2)(B) shall be eligible to serve in that capacity without giving bond, unless all heirs at law join in a petition authorizing the person to so serve.

Nothing contained in this section shall apply to trust agreements executed for the purpose of securing loans and guaranties thereof. No out-of-state or foreign corporate fiduciary shall have any more powers or privileges to conduct business or serve in a fiduciary capacity in this state than the laws of the state in which the foreign corporation is organized confer like powers upon corporations organized and doing business under the laws of this state or having their principal office in this state.

No lack of compliance with this section by any nonresident fiduciary acting as an attorney-in-fact under the power of attorney otherwise executed in accordance with the laws of this state shall be construed to affect the title to any real estate constituting the subject matter of the power of attorney.

Acts 1955, ch. 164, § 1; 1957, ch. 52, § 1; 1977, ch. 416, § 1; T.C.A., § 35-610; Acts 1985, ch. 140, § 32; 1985, ch. 312, § 2; 1988, ch. 854, § 15; 1991, ch. 187, § 1; 1993, ch. 453, § 1; 1995, ch. 177, §§ 4-12; 1996, ch. 768, § 2; 1997, ch. 426, § 21; 2000, ch. 730, § 1; 2005, ch. 99, §§ 10-12; 2016, ch. 809, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1996, ch. 768, which amended this section, is known and may be cited as the Bank Reform Act of 1996.

Acts 1997, ch. 426, § 26 provided that the amendments to this section by that act shall apply to all estates of decedents dying on or after January 1, 1998 and to all wills, other documents and proceedings related thereto.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment added the last sentence in (b)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 809, § 8. April 14, 2016.

Cross-References. Appointment and removal of trustees, title 35, ch. 15, part 7.

Appointment of non-resident executor of real estate under will, § 30-1-116.

Bonds, public administrators, guardians, and trustees, § 30-1-401.

Certified mail instead of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

Executors and administrators, bonds, title 30, ch. 1, part 2.

Service of process upon nonresident representative, § 30-1-104.

Durable power of attorney for health care, title 34, ch. 6, part 2.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (5th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 542, 561.

Tennessee Jurisprudence. 12 Tenn. Juris., Executors and Administrators, § 9, 91.

Law Reviews.

Selection and Removal of Fiduciaries (Robert L. McMurray), 26 No. 3 Tenn. B.J. 22 (1990).

35-50-108. Designation of beneficiaries of employee pension, stock bonus or investment plans.

If a person, entitled to receive payment in money, securities, or other property under a pension, retirement, death benefit, stock bonus, profit-sharing or employees' savings and investment plan, system or trust, designates, as provided in this section, a payee or beneficiary to receive payment of the money, securities, or other property upon death of the person making the designation or to receive payment of the money, securities, or other property upon the death of any other person, the right of the person or persons so designated to receive payment in accordance with the designation, and the ownership of the money, securities or other property so received, shall not be defeated or impaired by any statute or rule of law governing the transfer of property by will or gift or on intestacy.

This section is applicable to a designation even though it is revocable or subject to change by the person who makes it, and even though the money, securities or other property under the designation are not yet payable at the time the designation is made or the money, securities or other property are subject to withdrawal, collection or assignment by the person making the designation.

A person entitled to receive payment includes:

An employee or participant in a pension, retirement, death benefit, stock bonus, profit-sharing or employees' savings and investment plan, system or trust; and

Any person entitled to receive payment by reason of a payee or beneficiary designation described in this section.

A designation of a beneficiary or payee to receive payment upon death either of the person making the designation or of any other person must be made in writing and signed by the person making the designation, and must be agreed to by the employer or be made in accordance with rules prescribed for the pension, retirement, death benefit, stock bonus, profit-sharing or employees' savings and investment plan, system or trust.

This section shall not alter, abridge or limit title 29, chapter 12; title 31, chapter 1; title 66, chapter 3; or title 67, chapter 8, parts 2-4.

Acts 1961, ch. 133, §§ 1-4; T.C.A., §§ 35-611 — 35-614.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1961, ch. 133, § 5, provided that this section applies to designations made before or after February 27, 1961, by persons who die on or after February 27, 1961, and that it does not invalidate any contract or designation which is valid without regard to the provisions of the section.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (5th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 626.

Law Reviews.

Decedents' Estates, Trusts and Future Interests — 1961 Tennessee Survey (Herman L. Trautman), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1253 (1961).

35-50-109. Incorporation of § 35-50-110 in will or trust instrument.

By a clearly expressed intention of the testator or settlor so to do contained in a will, or in an instrument in writing by which a trust estate is created inter vivos, the language contained in the introductory paragraph of § 35-50-110, and in any one (1) or more of subdivisions (1)-(33) of that section, may be, by appropriate reference made to that language, incorporated in the will or other written instrument, to be applicable either to the fiduciary authorized to administer the estate of the testator, or to the fiduciary authorized to administer a trust estate established or to be established pursuant to the terms of the will or other written instrument, or to both types of fiduciaries, with the same effect and subject to the same judicial interpretation and control in appropriate cases as though the language were set forth verbatim in the instrument; provided, that the language contained in § 35-50-110(1)-(4) is appropriate only with respect to powers to be vested in the one (1) or more executors of the estate of a decedent, and is available only for incorporation by reference in a will, as powers of the executor or executors of the will.

“Estate,” as used in any subdivision of § 35-50-110, is construed to mean the estate of the decedent if by reference to the subdivision it has been made applicable to the executor or executors of a will, and is construed to mean the trust estate if by reference to the subdivision it has been made applicable to the trustee or trustees of such an estate.

As used in this section and § 35-50-110, “fiduciary,” and the masculine singular form of the pronoun referring to the fiduciary, are construed to mean the one (1) or more executors, whether male, female or corporate, of the estate of a decedent, or the one (1) or more trustees, whether male, female or corporate, of a testamentary or inter vivos trust estate, whichever in a particular case is appropriate.

Nothing contained in this section and § 35-50-110 shall be construed to limit the power of a court of competent jurisdiction to prohibit a fiduciary from taking any action, or to restrain a fiduciary in the taking of any action, notwithstanding the authorizations or powers vested in the fiduciary by any written instrument in which all or any part of § 35-50-110 is incorporated by reference.

Acts 1963, ch. 110, §§ 1, 2, 4; T.C.A., §§ 35-616, 35-617, 35-619; Acts 1991, ch. 182, § 1.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (5th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 737, 755.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 4-612.

Law Reviews.

Wills and Fiduciary Powers (Robert L. McMurray), 31 Tenn. L. Rev. 191 (1964).

Collateral References.

Construction of reference in will to statute where pertinent provisions of statute are subsequently changed by amendment or repeal. 63 A.L.R.3d 603.